Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.28
Board of Regents; Department of Health and Human Services and Department of Correctional Services; electric current; agreements.

The Department of Health and Human Services and the Department of Correctional Services are authorized to furnish and to enter into agreements with the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska to furnish a supply of electric current to the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska at the line now maintained, or hereafter constructed, between the electric power plant at the University of Nebraska and the State Capitol, which power shall be furnished by the electric power plant located at the Department of Correctional Services adult correctional facility, except that such electrical service to the Board of Regents shall be furnished only if the same may be generated and furnished without impairment or reduction of the power necessary to proper and efficient operation of state buildings and institutions dependent upon the Department of Correctional Services adult correctional facility power plant.

Laws 1949, c. 216, § 3, p. 614;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 11;

R.R.S.1943, § 72-710.02;

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 19;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 864.